Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 5.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20102-112
Nebraska State Fair Relocation Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Nebraska State Fair Relocation Cash Fund is created. The State Treasurer shall credit to the fund such money as is transferred to the fund by the Legislature or donated as gifts, bequests, or other contributions to such fund from public or private entities. The fund shall be expended by the Nebraska State Fair Board to provide funding to assist in the construction and improvement of capital facilities necessary to develop a location suitable for the operation of the Nebraska State Fair. Expenditures from the fund shall not be limited to the amount appropriated. The money in the fund shall not be subject to any fiscal year or biennium limitation requiring reappropriation of the unexpended balance at the end of the fiscal year or biennium. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2008, LB1116, § 5.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.